Hawaii statutes.
TITLE 35.
APPEAL AND ERROR

Chapter

641 Appeals

642 Reserved Questions--Repealed

CHAPTER
641

APPEALS

Part I. Appeals in Civil Actions and
Proceedings

Section

641-1 Appeals as of right or interlocutory,
civil

matters

641-2 Review on and disposition of appeal

641-3 Stay of proceedings to enforce a judgment

Part II. Appeals in Criminal Proceedings

641-11 From circuit courts

641-12 From district courts

641-13 By State in criminal cases

641-14 Stay in criminal cases

641-15 Service

641-16 Judgment; no reversal when

641-17 Interlocutory appeals from circuit

courts, criminal matters

641-18 Time for appeal in case of suspended
sentence

Part III. General Provisions

641-31 Bonds, costs, failure to file or pay,
defects

641-32 Liability on bond, how enforced

Note

Act 89, SL 1972, completely revised this chapter. The
sections of the chapter are renumbered as set forth below. The following table
shows the current disposition of the chapter.

Disposition Table

HRS (1968) Herein HRS
(1968) Herein

641-1 R 641-18 641-15

641-2 641-1 641-19 to 23 R

641-3 R 641-24 641-16

641-4 641-2 641-31 641-17

641-5 641-3 641-32 to 36 R

641-11 641-11 641-41 641-18

641-11.5 641-12 641-42 R

641-12 641-13 641-43 641-31

641-13 to 15 R 641-44 R

641-16 641-14 641-45 641-32

641-17 R 641-46 R

Amendments of this chapter by L 1979, c 111, take precedence
over conflicting statutes. L 1979, c 111, §28.

Cross References

Appeals, foreclosures, see chapter 667.

Rules of Court

Appeals to supreme court and intermediate court of appeals,
see Hawaii Rules of Appellate Procedure; appeal to circuit court, see HRCP rule
72.

See also Hawaii Appellate Mediation Program Rules.

Law Journals and Reviews

Remarks on Alternative Proposals to Remedy Appellate Court
Congestion in Hawaii. 14 HBJ No. 2 Summer 1978, pg. 55.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next